Utah statutes.
76-10-203.   Obstruction of watergates.
Every person who rafts or floats logs, timber, or wood down any river or
stream and allows the logs, timber, or wood to accumulate at or obstruct the
watergates owned by any person or irrigation company taking or diverting the
water of the river or stream for irrigation or manufacturing purposes is
guilty of a crime punishable under Section 73-2-27.
